bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="सो/__pstperf_minus_aux_ila">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इलि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इलि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इलस</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इलन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इलि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इलि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अलु</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अलु</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इलस</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इलिन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="दे/__pstperf_minus_aux_ila">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लेस</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लेन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लू</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लू</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लेस</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लिन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/जा__pstperf_minus_aux_ila1">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलि</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलि</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइल</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइल</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलेस</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलन</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलि</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलि</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलू</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलू</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलेस</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गइलिन</l>
          <r>जा<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="दे">
      <i>दे</i>
      <par n="दे/__pstperf_minus_aux_ila" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सो">
      <i>सो</i>
      <par n="सो/__pstperf_minus_aux_ila" />
    </e>
    <e lm="">
      <i />
      <par n="/जा__pstperf_minus_aux_ila1" />
    </e>
